Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 3 Proceeding Before Court

22-2-130.
Authority to petition superior court for judgment in rem; applicability to acquisition of public property.

Whenever the government of the State of Georgia, the United States government, or any person having the privilege of exercising the right of eminent domain desires to take or damage private property in pursuance of any law so authorizing and finds or believes that the title of the apparent or presumptive owner of such property is defective, doubtful, incomplete, or in controversy or that there are or may be unknown persons or nonresidents who have or may have some claim or demand thereon or some actual or contingent interest or estate therein or that there are minors or persons under disability who are or may be interested therein or that there are taxes due or that should be paid thereon or concludes for any reason that it is desirable to have a judicial ascertainment of any question connected with the matter, such government or person may, through any authorized representative, petition the superior court of the county having jurisdiction for a judgment in rem against the property or interest, condemning the same to the use of the petitioner upon payment of just and adequate compensation therefor to the person or persons entitled to such payment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the provisions of this article shall also apply to the acquisition of public property or an interest therein by condemnation and the power of eminent domain. As used in this subsection, the term “public property” has the meaning provided for in Code Section 50-16-180.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-1104; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 251, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1187, § 3.

22-2-131.
Contents of petition.

The petition referred to in Code Section 22-2-130 shall set forth:

The facts showing the right to condemn;

The property or interest to be taken or damaged;

The names and residences of the persons whose property or interests are to be taken or otherwise affected, so far as known;

A description of any unknown persons or classes of unknown persons whose rights in the property or interest are to be affected;

Such other facts as are necessary for a full understanding of the cause;

A statement setting forth the necessity to condemn the private property and describing the public use for which the condemnor seeks the property; and

A prayer for such judgment of condemnation as may be proper and desired.

If any of the persons referred to in this Code section are minors or under disability, the fact shall be stated.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 2; Code 1933, § 36-1105; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 14/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-2-132.
Order to appear; directions for notice and service thereof; attachment of process to petition; cause to proceed as in rem.

Upon presentation of the petition, the presiding judge shall issue an order requiring the condemnor, the owner of the property or of any interest therein, and the representative of any owner to appear at a time and place named in the order and make known their objections if any, rights, or claims as to the value of the property or of their interest therein, and any other matters material to their respective rights; provided, however, that if the petition includes affidavits from known and located persons with a legal claim, stating that such condemnees do not oppose the condemnation, no hearing pursuant to this Code section shall be required.

The day named in the order shall be as early as may be convenient but shall be no less than 20 days from the date of the petition, due regard being given to the necessities of notice.

The order shall give appropriate directions for notice and the service thereof.

It shall not be necessary to attach any other process to the petition except the order referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section, and the cause shall proceed as in rem.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 3; Code 1933, § 36-1106; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 15/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-2-133.
Service of process generally.

All persons entitled to notice under the facts stated in the petition who are sui juris and within this state and whose residence is known shall be served by the sheriff with a copy of the petition and order as in other causes at law, unless such service is waived in writing. All other service shall be made in the method pointed out by Part 2 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of this title, and all persons so served shall be deemed parties to the cause.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 3; Code 1933, § 36-1107.

22-2-134.
Discretion of judge to cause additional notice or service to be given; notification of tax collector or tax commissioner.

In any cases where it seems to the presiding judge to be in the interest of justice and of more effective notice to cause additional notice or service to be given, it shall be within his discretion so to order. In such cases, the additional notice and service shall be made as ordered before the cause proceeds to final hearing. In cases where any taxes are alleged or supposed to be due or unpaid, the order shall direct that a separate notice to that effect be given the proper tax collector or tax commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 3; Code 1933, § 36-1108.

22-2-135.
Appointment of assessors; discretion of judge to have issues tried in first instance by jury.

On the day named in the order made pursuant to Code Section 22-2-132, or at any other time to which the hearing may be continued, the court, having first passed on and adjudged all questions touching service and notice, shall, after hearing from all persons responding and desiring to be heard, make such order as to the appointment of assessors as shall conform most nearly to Article 1 of this chapter and give all interested persons equal rights in the selection thereof. If, by reason of conflicting interests or otherwise, such equality of right cannot be preserved, the judge shall himself make such order on the subject as shall secure a fair and impartial assessment or may in his discretion order the issues tried in the first instance by a jury. In any event, it shall be within the power of the court to hear the cause as speedily as may be consistent with justice and due process of law.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 4; Code 1933, § 36-1109.

22-2-136.
Appeal from assessors’ award.

In case assessors are appointed, the same right of appeal shall lie from their award to a jury in the superior court, as is provided in Part 5 of Article 1 of this chapter and upon like terms and conditions in all respects as are therein provided.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 4; Code 1933, § 36-1110.

22-2-137.
Factors to be considered in determining or estimating just and adequate compensation; determination of date of taking; inclusion of date of approval of original location of highway in petition for condemnation; newspaper advertisement.

In determining or estimating just and adequate compensation to be paid to the owner of any property or interest condemned for public road and street purposes, neither the board of assessors nor the jury, in the event of an appeal to a jury, shall be restricted to the agricultural or productive qualities of the land; but inquiry shall be made as to all other legitimate purposes to which the land could be appropriated. The date of taking as contemplated in this Code section shall be the date of the filing of the condemnation proceedings for the acquisition of the property or interest.

The condemning authority shall cause the petition for condemnation to set forth the date of the approval of the original location of the highway. It shall be the further duty of the condemning authority, within 30 days from the date of the original approval and designation of said location as a highway, to cause the location of said highway in said county to be advertised once each week for four consecutive weeks in the newspaper of the county in which the sheriff’s advertisements are carried; and said advertisement shall designate the land lots or land districts of said county through which such highway will be located. Said advertisement shall further show the date of the said original location of such highway as hereinbefore provided for in this subsection. Said advertisement shall further state that a plat or map of the project showing the exact date of original location is on file at the office of the Department of Transportation and that any interested party may obtain a copy of same by writing to the Department of Transportation (One Georgia Center, 600 West Peachtree NW, Atlanta, Georgia 30308) and paying a nominal cost therefor.

In determining just and adequate compensation for property or interests taken or condemned for public road and street purposes, the award of the board of assessors or the verdict of the jury, in the event of an appeal, shall, in addition to fixing the value of the land actually taken and used for such purposes, take into consideration the prospective and consequential damages to the remaining property or interest from which the property or interest actually taken was cut off, which consequential damages result to such remaining property or interest because of the location of such public road or street upon the portion actually taken. In addition, the increase of the value of such remaining property or interest from the location of such public road or street shall be considered. Such consequential benefits, if any, may be offset against such consequential damages, if any; but in no event shall consequential benefits be offset against the value of the property or interest actually taken for such public improvement.

History.

Code 1933, § 36-1117, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 320, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 22/HB 142.

Law reviews.

For comment on State Hwy. Dep’t v. Lumpkin,

222 Ga. 727

,

152 S.E.2d 557

(1966), see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 483 (1967).

22-2-138.
Scope of award or verdict; molding of award or verdict; power of court to adjudge condemnation of title upon deposit of amount of award or verdict into court; disposition of award by court.

The award or verdict, as the case may be, shall have respect either to the entire and unencumbered fee or to any separate claim against or interest in the property, as the court may order. The award or verdict may be molded under the direction of the court so as to do complete justice and avoid confusion of interests. It shall be within the power of the court, upon payment of the award or verdict into the registry of the court, to adjudge a condemnation of the title to the property or interest therein and give such direction as to the disposition of the fund as shall be proper, according to the rights of the several respondents, and to cause such pleadings to be filed and such issues to be made as shall be appropriate for an ascertainment and determination of such rights.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 5; Code 1933, § 36-1111.

22-2-139.
Right of interested persons to intervene; effect of subsequent proceedings on rights of condemnor.

Nothing in this article which refers to any ruling or order, or time for responding thereto, shall be held or construed to exclude any person by way of default from making known his rights or claims in the property or interest or in the fund arising therefrom. Any person making any such claim may file appropriate pleadings or intervention at any time before verdict or award, and such person shall be fully heard thereon. If any person after judgment of condemnation desires to come in and be heard on any such claim, he shall be allowed to do so. After condemnation is had and the fund paid into the registry of the court, the condemnor shall not be concerned with or affected by any subsequent proceedings unless upon appeal from the verdict or award as provided in Code Section 22-2-136.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 7; Code 1933, § 36-1113.

22-2-140.
Notification of court by tax collector or tax commissioner of taxes due on property or interest; actions by court to discharge lien.

It shall be the duty of any tax collector or tax commissioner notified as required in Code Section 22-2-134 to make known to the court in writing the taxes due on the property or interest; and the court shall give such direction as will satisfy the tax liability and discharge the lien thereon.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 8; Code 1933, § 36-1114.

22-2-141.
Filing and recording of award, decree, and description of condemned property or interest or copies thereof; payment of fees to clerk of superior court.

When the condemnation is fully completed, the award, whether made by assessors or by the verdict of a jury, together with the decree of the court based thereon and a full and complete description of the property or interest condemned or duly certified copies of such award, decree, and description, shall be filed and recorded in the records of deeds in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county where the land so condemned lies. If the land lies in more than one county, such filing and recording shall be made in each county in which the land lies. The clerk shall be entitled to the same fees for such filing and recording as are allowed by law for the filing and recording of deeds, said fees to be paid by the party in whose favor said condemnation is had.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 231, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-1116.

Cross references.

Duty of clerk of superior court to maintain record of deeds, §

15-6-61

.

22-2-142.
Intent of article regarding effect on other methods of condemnation.

This article is intended to be supplementary to and cumulative of Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter in cases in which the State of Georgia, the United States, or any person having the privilege of exercising the right of eminent domain is concerned. This article is also intended to make simpler and more effective the method of condemnation in those cases where conflicting interests or doubtful questions render a judicial supervision of the procedure desirable. In all particulars not otherwise specially provided for in this article, the court shall conform its procedure as nearly as possible to Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter, and the same shall remain in force.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 92, § 9; Code 1933, § 36-1115; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 251, § 1.